Utah statutes.
16-10a-1423.   Appeal from denial of reinstatement.

If the division denies a corporation's application for reinstatement under Section 16-10a-1422 following administrative dissolution, the division shall mail to the corporation in the manner provided in Subsection 16-10a-1421(5) written notice:

(1)  setting forth the reasons for denying the application; and

(2)  stating that the corporation has the right to appeal the division's determination to the executive director of the Department of Commerce in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.

